Hawaii statutes.
§187A-9 Federal aid in sport fish
restoration. The State hereby assents to the provisions of the Federal Aid
in Sport Fish Restoration (Dingell-Johnson/Wallop-Breaux) Act (64 Stat. 430, 16
U.S.C. §777), as amended. The department shall perform those acts as may be
necessary to the conduct and establishment of cooperative aquatic life
restoration, management, development, aquatic education, and recreational
boating access projects, as defined in the Act of Congress and in compliance
with the Act and regulations adopted by the Secretary of the Interior
thereunder; provided that federal aid funds granted under the Act shall be used
for the purposes of approved projects, and no funds accruing to the State from
license fees paid by sport fishers, including any interest, dividend, or other
income earned from the license fees, shall be diverted for any purpose other
than as provided for in the Act and regulations adopted pursuant thereto. [L
1985, c 94, pt of §1; am L 1993, c 143, §3]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next